Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3146
Mental health and substance use disorder services; Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care; duties.

The Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services shall:

(1) Require contractor compliance with federal and state laws and rules and regulations applicable to coverage for mental health or substance use disorder services including early and periodic screening and diagnostic and treatment services for children and youth in the medical assistance program;

(2) Make public the surveys, financial analyses, and contract audits and parity reports prepared by a contractor and the results of parity compliance reports;

(3) Ensure access to mental health and substance use disorder service providers, including access parity with medical and surgical service providers, through regulation and review of claims, provider reimbursement procedures, network adequacy, and provider reimbursement rate adequacy;

(4) Establish a monthly electronic communication system with all health care providers in the medical assistance program relating to any amendment or other change in the contracts with medicaid managed care organizations;

(5) Define network adequacy; and

(6) Annually post criteria used by the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care to assess network adequacy and each managed care organization's compliance on the Department of Health and Human Services website.

Laws 2025, LB380, § 9.